Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1228
Certificate of number; contents.

Every certificate of number shall contain the following information: Name and address of the owner, classification number or letter as classified by the commission, length, type of construction, material used in the boat, whether inboard or outboard motor power, type of fuel, make, and the hull identification number.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 115;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 4.